District of Columbia statutes.
21-908

Care in a Veterans’ Administration facility.

(a)

If a person adjudicated to be a person with mental illness under this chapter is entitled to care and treatment in a Veterans’ Administration facility, the United States District Court for the District of Columbia may commit him to the custody of the Administrator of Veterans’ Affairs for placement in an available facility, or the Superintendent of Saint Elizabeths Hospital may transfer him to such a facility.

(b)

This chapter does not limit, restrict, or deprive the courts of a State or the District of Columbia of jurisdiction to commit to the Veterans’ Administration a person with mental illness entitled to care and treatment by the Veterans’ Administration in accordance with the laws of the State or the District of Columbia.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 765, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(d)(7), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 21-908.
1973 Ed., § 21-908.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “person with mental illness” for “mentally ill person” in (a) and (b).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.